Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 46 Rhode Island State Council on the Arts [Repealed.]

16-46-1 — 16-46-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §§

16-46-1

—

16-46-1

0; P.L. 1967, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 91, §§ 1-4; P.L. 1980, ch. 226, §§ 6, 7; Repealed by P.L. 1980, ch. 395, § 1. For present law, see §

42-75-1

et seq.